Utah statutes.
78B-12-204.   Adjusted gross income.

(1)  As used in this chapter, "adjusted gross income" is the amount calculated by subtracting from gross income alimony previously ordered and paid and child support previously ordered.

(2)  The guidelines do not reduce the total child support award by adjusting the gross incomes of the parents for alimony ordered in the pending proceeding.  In establishing alimony, the court shall consider that in determining the child support, the guidelines do not provide a deduction from gross income for alimony.

